District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-402

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 92-180, § 2
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-402.
1981 Ed., § 29-602.
1973 Ed., § 29-1102.